California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(7) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1999, the Franchise Tax Board shall recompute the exemption amounts prescribed in paragraph (5) and the phaseout of exemption amounts prescribed in paragraph (6). Those computations shall be made as follows:

(A) The California Department of Industrial Relations
 shall transmit annually to the Franchise Tax Board the percentage change in the California Consumer Price Index for all items from June of the prior calendar year to June of the current calendar year, no later than August 1 of the current calendar year.

(B) The Franchise Tax Board shall do both of the following:

(i) Compute an inflation adjustment factor by adding 100 percent to the percentage change figure that is furnished pursuant to subparagraph (A) and dividing the result by 100.

(ii) Multiply the preceding taxable year exemption amounts and the phaseout of exemption amounts by the inflation adjustment factor determined in clause (i) and round off the resulting products to the nearest one dollar ($1). 

(c) (1) Section 56(b)(1)(E) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to standard deduction and deduction for personal exemptions not allowed, is modified, for purposes of this part, to deny the standard deduction allowed by Section 17073.5.

(2) Section 56(b)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to treatment of incentive stock options, shall be modified to additionally provide the following:

(A) Section 421 of the Internal Revenue Code does not apply to the transfer of stock acquired pursuant to the exercise of a California qualified stock option under Section 17502.

(B) Section 422(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code applies in any case
 in which the disposition and inclusion of a California qualified stock option for purposes of this chapter are within the same taxable year, and that section does not apply in any other case.

(C) The adjusted basis of any stock acquired by the exercise of a California qualified stock option shall be determined on the basis of the treatment prescribed by this paragraph.

(d) The provisions of Section 57(a)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to tax-exempt interest, shall not apply.

(e) The provisions of Section 59(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the alternative minimum tax foreign tax credit, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 5.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17062.1.

For the purposes of this chapter, Part VI of Subchapter A of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to alternative minimum tax, as it read on January 1, 2015, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 6.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17062.3.

Section 56A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to adjusted financial statement income, shall not apply.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 9.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17062.5.

Section 55(b)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to maximum rate of tax on net capital gain of noncorporate taxpayers, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 322, Sec. 15.   Effective August 20, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17063.

(a) There shall be allowed as a credit against the net tax (as defined by Section 17039) for any taxable year an amount equal to the minimum tax credit for that taxable year.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), the minimum tax credit shall be determined in accordance with Section 53 of the Internal Revenue Code, except as otherwise provided in this part.

(c) For purposes of this chapter, the amount determined under Section 53(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be the regular tax as defined by paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 17062, reduced by the sum of the credits allowable under this part, other than:

(1) The credits described in paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 17039.

(2) A credit that reduces the tax below the tentative minimum tax, as defined by Section 17062.

(d) Section 53(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the application to applicable corporations, does not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 10.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Computation of Taxable Income [17071. - 17307.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definition of Gross Income, Adjusted Gross Income, Taxable Income, etc. [17071. - 17078.]

17071.

Section 61 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to gross income defined, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 987, Sec. 7.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17072.

(a) Section 62 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to adjusted gross income defined, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) Section 62(a)(2)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to certain expenses of elementary and secondary school teachers, shall not apply.

(c) Section 62(a)(21) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to attorneys fees relating to awards to whistleblowers, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 14, Sec. 9.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

17073.

(a) Section 63 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to taxable income defined, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) The deduction allowed by Section 17208.1, relating to interest on loans or financed indebtedness obtained from a publicly owned utility for the purchase and installation of energy efficient products or equipment, may not be treated as a miscellaneous itemized deduction under Section 67(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the 2-percent
 floor on miscellaneous deductions.

(c) For individuals who do not itemize deductions, the standard deduction computed in accordance with Section 17073.5 shall be allowed as a deduction in computing taxable income.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 664, Sec. 202.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

17073.5.

(a) A taxpayer may elect to take a standard deduction as follows:

(1) In the case of a taxpayer, other than a head of a household or a surviving spouse (as defined in Section 17046) or a married couple filing a joint return, the standard deduction shall be one thousand eight hundred eighty dollars ($1,880).

(2) In the case of a head of household or a surviving spouse (as defined in Section 17046) or a
 married couple filing a joint return, the standard deduction shall be three thousand seven hundred sixty dollars ($3,760).

(b) The standard deduction provided for in subdivision (a) shall be in lieu of all deductions other than those which are to be subtracted from gross income in computing adjusted gross income under Section 17072.

(c) (1) The provisions of this section shall be applied in lieu of the provisions of Sections 63(c) and 63(f) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to standard deductions.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), Section 63(c)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to limitations on the standard deduction of certain dependents, and Section 63(c)(6)of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to certain individuals not eligible for the standard deduction, shall apply, except
 as otherwise provided. For purposes of this paragraph, the amount specified in Section 63(c)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be adjusted for inflation in accordance with the provisions of Section 63(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(d) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1988, the Franchise Tax Board shall recompute the standard deduction amounts prescribed in subdivision (a). That computation shall be made as follows:

(1) The California Department of Industrial Relations shall transmit annually to the Franchise Tax Board the percentage change in the California Consumer Price Index for all items from June of the prior calendar year to June of the current calendar year, no later than August 1 of the current calendar year.

(2) The Franchise Tax Board shall compute an inflation adjustment
 factor by adding 100 percent to that portion of the percentage change figure which is furnished pursuant to paragraph (1) and dividing the result by 100.

(3) The Franchise Tax Board shall multiply the standard deduction amounts in the preceding taxable year by the inflation adjustment factor determined in paragraph (2), and round off the resulting products to the nearest one dollar ($1).

(4) In computing the standard deduction amounts pursuant to this subdivision, the amount provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall be twice the amount provided in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 322, Sec. 16.   Effective August 20, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17074.

Section 64 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to ordinary income defined, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 987, Sec. 9.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17075.

Section 65 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to ordinary loss defined, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 987, Sec. 10.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17076.

(a) Section 67 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the 2-percent floor on miscellaneous itemized deductions, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) A deduction allowable under this part that exceeds three thousand dollars ($3,000) and is described in Section 17049, relating to computation of tax where the taxpayer restores a substantial amount held under claim of right, may not be treated as a miscellaneous itemized deduction under Section 67 of the Internal Revenue Code, as applicable for purposes of this part.

(c) Section 67(g) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to suspension
 for taxable years 2018 to 2025, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 11.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17077.

Section 68 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to overall limitation on itemized deductions, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(a) “Six percent” shall be substituted for “3 percent” in Section 68(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(b) Section 68(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply and in lieu thereof the term “applicable amount” in each place it appears in Section 68(a) of the Internal Revenue Code means one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in the case of a single individual, or a spouse filing a separate return, one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) in the case of a head of household, and two hundred
 thousand dollars ($200,000) in the case of a surviving spouse, or spouses filing a joint return.

(c) Section 68(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to inflation adjustments, shall not apply. However, for any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1992, the applicable amounts specified in subdivision (b) shall be recomputed annually in the same manner as the recomputation of income tax brackets under subdivision (h) of Section 17041.

(d) Section 68(f) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to section not to apply, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 236, Sec. 3.   (SB 1435)   Effective September 14, 2026.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, provided in Section 46\nof Stats. 2026, Ch. 236.)
-------------------------------------------

17078.

(a) Section 988 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to treatment of certain foreign currency transactions, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) Section 988(a)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to source, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 877, Sec. 13.   Effective October 6, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Items Specifically Included in Gross Income [17081. - 17091.]

17081.

Part II of Subchapter B of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to items that are specifically included in gross income, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 873, Sec. 5.   Effective October 6, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

17082.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2023, the income of an incomplete gift nongrantor trust shall be included in a qualified taxpayer’s gross income to the extent the income of the trust would be taken into account in computing the qualified taxpayer’s taxable income if the trust in its entirety were treated as a grantor trust under Section 17731.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), Section 17745 applies to distributions from an incomplete gift nongrantor trust.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the income of an incomplete gift nongrantor trust shall not be included in a qualified taxpayer’s gross income for a
 taxable year if all of the following apply:

(1) The fiduciary of the incomplete gift nongrantor trust timely files an original California Fiduciary Income Tax Return and makes an irrevocable election on that return to be taxed as a resident nongrantor trust, pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 17731). The election shall be made in the form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(2) The incomplete gift nongrantor trust is a nongrantor trust pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 17731).

(3) Ninety percent or more of the distributable net income of the incomplete gift nongrantor trust, pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 17731), is distributed, or treated as being distributed pursuant
 to Section 17752 or 17731, including subdivision (a), for purposes of Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 17731), to a charitable organization, as defined in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) (A) “Incomplete gift nongrantor trust” means a trust that meets both of the following conditions:

(i) The trust does not qualify as a grantor trust under Subpart E of Part I of Subchapter J of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to grantors and others treated as substantial owners.

(ii) The qualified taxpayer’s transfer of assets to the trust is treated
 as an incomplete gift under Section 2511 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to transfers in general.

(B) “Incomplete gift nongrantor trust” shall not include a trust, or portion of a trust, that qualifies as a charitable remainder trust under Section 664 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(2) “Qualified taxpayer” means a grantor of an incomplete gift nongrantor trust.

(3) “Resident nongrantor trust” means a trust that is not a grantor trust and where the tax applies to the entire taxable income of the trust
 based on the residency of the fiduciary or beneficiary in accordance with Section 17742.

(e) (1) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe any regulations necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section.

(2) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe rules, guidelines, procedures, or other guidance to carry out the purposes of this section. Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any rule, guideline, procedure, or other guidance prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 376)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

17083.

Section 85 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to unemployment compensation, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 987, Sec. 14.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17085.

Section 72 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to annuities, certain proceeds of endowment and life insurance contracts, is modified as follows:

(a) The amendments and transitional rules made by Public Law 99-514 shall be applicable to this part for the same transactions and the same years as they are applicable for federal purposes, except that the repeal of Section 72(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to repeal of special rule for employees’ annuities, shall apply only to the following:

(1) Any individual whose annuity starting date is after December 31, 1986.

(2) At the election of the taxpayer, any individual whose annuity starting date is after July 1, 1986, and before January 1, 1987.

(b) The amount of a distribution from an individual retirement account or annuity or employee trust or employee annuity that is includable in gross income for federal purposes shall be reduced for purposes of this part by the lesser of either of the following:

(1) An amount equal to the amount includable in federal gross income for the taxable year.

(2) An amount equal to the basis in the account or annuity allowed by Section 17507 (relating to individual retirement accounts and simplified employee pensions), the increased basis allowed by Sections 17504 and 17506 (relating to plans of self-employed
 individuals), the increased basis allowed by Section 17501, or the increased basis allowed by Section 17551 that is remaining after adjustment for reductions in gross income under
 this provision in prior taxable years.

(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the amount of the additional tax imposed under this part shall be computed in accordance with Sections 72(m), (q), (t), and (v) of the Internal Revenue Code, as applicable for federal income tax purposes for the same taxable year, using a rate of 212 percent, in lieu of the rate provided in those sections.

(2) In the case where Section 72(t)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rules for simple retirement accounts, as applicable for federal income tax purposes for the same taxable year, applies, the rate in paragraph (1) shall be 6 percent in lieu of the
 212 percent rate specified therein.

(d) Section 72(f)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be applicable without applying the exceptions which immediately follow that paragraph.

(e) The amendments made by Section 844 of the federal Pension Protection Act of 2006 (Public Law 109-280) to Section 72(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 236, Sec. 4.   (SB 1435)   Effective September 14, 2026.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, provided in Section 46\nof Stats. 2026, Ch. 236.)
-------------------------------------------

17085.7.

(a) In the case of any distribution made on account of a notice to withhold (pursuant to Section 18670 or 18670.5) on a qualified retirement plan, no additional tax shall be imposed in accordance with Section 72(t) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(b) This section shall apply to distributions after December 31, 1999.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 931, Sec. 4.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17086.

(a) Noncash patronage allocations from farmers’ cooperative and mutual associations (whether paid in capital stock, revolving fund certificates, retain certificates, certificates of indebtedness, letters of advice or in some other manner that discloses the dollar amount of those noncash patronage allocations) may, at the election of the taxpayer, be considered as income and included in gross income for the taxable year in which received.

(b) If a
 taxpayer exercises the election provided for in subdivision (a), the amount included in gross income shall be the face amount of those allocations. 

(c) If a taxpayer elects to exclude noncash patronage allocations from gross income for the taxable year in which received, those allocations shall be included in gross income in the year that they are redeemed or realized upon.

(d) If a taxpayer exercises the election provided for in subdivision (c), the face amount of those noncash patronage allocations shall be disclosed in the return made for the taxable year in which those noncash patronage allocations were received.

(e) If a taxpayer exercises the election provided for in subdivision (a) or (c) for any taxable year, then the method of computing income so adopted shall be adhered to with respect to all subsequent
 taxable years unless with the approval of the Franchise Tax Board a change to a different method is authorized.

(f) If a taxpayer has made the election provided for in subdivision (c), then (1) the statutory period for the assessment of a deficiency for any taxable year in which the amount of any noncash patronage allocations are realized shall not expire prior to the expiration of four years from the date the Franchise Tax Board is notified by the taxpayer (in the manner as the Franchise Tax Board may by regulation prescribe) of the realization of gain on those allocations; and (2) that deficiency may be assessed prior to the expiration of that four-year period, notwithstanding the provisions of Section 19057 or the provisions of any other law or rule of law which would otherwise prevent that assessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 6.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

17087.

(a) Section 86 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to Social Security and Tier 1 Railroad Retirement Benefits, shall not apply.

(b) Section 72(r) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to Tier 2 Railroad Retirement Benefits, shall not apply.

(c) Section 105(h) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to sick pay under the Railroad Unemployment Insurance Act, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 987, Sec. 18.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17087.5.

(a) Subchapter S of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to tax treatment of “S corporations” and their shareholders, shall apply, except as otherwise provided under this part or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

(b) Section 1371(f) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to cash distributions following post-termination transition period, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 13.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17087.6.

If a limited liability company is classified as a partnership for California tax purposes, a person with a membership or economic interest shall take into account amounts required to be recognized under Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 17851).

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1200, Sec. 52.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

17088.

(a) Subchapter M of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to regulated investment companies and real estate investment trusts, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) Section 17145 shall apply in lieu of Section 852(b)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to exempt-interest dividends.

(c) (1) Section 852(b)(3)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to treatment by shareholders of undistributed capital gains, shall not apply.

(2) Section 852(g)(1)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified by substituting the phrase “subdivision (a) of Section 17145” for the phrase “the first sentence of subsection (b)(5)” contained therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 359, Sec. 5.   (AB 154)   Effective September 30, 2015.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2015, as provided in Sec. 41 of Stats. 2015, Ch. 359.)
-------------------------------------------

17088.1.

(a) The amendments made to Section 860E(a)(3)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code by Section 2303(a)(2)(C) of Public Law 116-136, relating to conforming amendments, shall not apply.

(b) The amendments made to Section 860E(a)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code by Section 10101(a)(4)(B)(ii) of Public Law 117-169, relating to conforming adjustments, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 14.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17088.3.

(a) Section 7518 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to tax incentives relating to merchant marine capital construction funds, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) Section 7518(d)(2)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified as follows:

(1) By substituting “70 percent” in lieu of the reference to “the percentage applicable under Section 243(a)(1).”

(2) To refer to Section 24402 in lieu of Section 243 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(c) Section 7518(d)(2)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to refer to “interest income exempt from taxation under this part” in lieu of “interest income exempt from taxation under Section 103.”

(d) Section 7518(g)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified as follows:

(1) To refer to Article 6 (commencing with Section 19101) of Chapter 4 of Part 10.2 in lieu of Section 6601 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(2) To refer to Article 7 (commencing with Section 19131) of Chapter 4 of Part 10.2 in lieu of Section 6651 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(e) Section 7518(g)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified as follows:

(1) By substituting a reference to “this part” in lieu of “Chapter 1” in each place in which it appears.

(2) To refer to Section 17041 in lieu of Section 1 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(3) The last sentence in Section 7518(g)(6)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 611, Sec. 12.   Effective October 3, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

17090.

Gross income includes cash allowances received by an employee under a parking cash-out program, except any portion used for a ridesharing purpose and excluded from gross income by Section 17149.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 554, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

17091.

(a) Section 71 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to alimony and separate maintenance payments, as it read on January 1, 2015, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply for any divorce or separation instrument executed after December 31, 2025, or for any divorce or separation instrument executed on or before December 31, 2025, and modified after that date, if the modification expressly provides that the amendments made by this subdivision apply to such modification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 236, Sec. 5.   (SB 1435)   Effective September 14, 2026.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, provided in Section 46\nof Stats. 2026, Ch. 236.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Items Specifically Excluded from Gross Income [17131. - 17158.5.]

17131.

Part III of Subchapter B of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to items that are specifically excluded from gross income, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 691, Sec. 7.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

17131.1.

(a) Gross income does not include any excludable restitution payments received by an eligible individual (or the individual’s heirs or estate) and any excludable interest.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) The basis of any property received by an eligible individual (or the individual’s heirs or estate) as part of an excludable restitution payment shall be the fair market value of that property as of the
 time of the receipt.

(2) “Eligible individual” means a person who was persecuted on the basis of race, religion, physical or mental disability, or sexual orientation by Nazi Germany, any other Axis regime, or any other Nazi-controlled or Nazi-allied country.

(3) “Excludable restitution payment” means any payment or distribution to an individual (or the individual’s heirs or estate) that is any of the following:

(A) Is payable by reason of the individual’s status as an eligible individual, including any amount payable by any foreign country, the United States of America, or any other foreign or domestic entity, or a fund established by any such country or entity, any amount payable as a result of a final resolution of a legal action, and any amount payable under a law providing for payments or restitution of
 property.

(B) Constitutes the direct or indirect return of, or compensation or reparation for, assets stolen or hidden from, or otherwise lost to, the individual before, during, or immediately after World War II by reason of the individual’s status as an eligible individual, including any proceeds of insurance under policies issued on eligible individuals by European insurance companies immediately before and during World War II.

(C) Consists of interest which is payable as part of any payment or distribution described in subparagraph (A) or (B).

(4) “Excludable interest” means any interest earned by any of the following:

(A) Escrow accounts or settlement funds established pursuant to the settlement of the action entitled “In re: Holocaust Victim Assets
 Litigation,” (E.D.N.Y.) C.A. No. 96-4849.

(B) Funds to benefit eligible individuals or their heirs created by the International Commission on Holocaust Insurance Claims as a result of the Agreement between the Government of the United States of America and the Government of the Federal Republic of Germany concerning the Foundation “Remembrance, Responsibility, and Future,” dated July 17, 2000.

(C) Similar funds subject to the administration of the United States courts created to provide excludable restitution payments to eligible individuals (or eligible individuals’ heirs or estates).

(c) (1) This section shall apply to any amount received on or after January 1, 2000.

(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to create any
 inference with respect to the proper tax treatment of any amount received before January 1, 2000.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 701, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

17131.2.

(a) Gross income does not include any excludable settlement payments received by an eligible individual (or the individual’s heirs or estate) and any excludable interest.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) The basis of any property received by an eligible individual (or the individual’s heirs or estate) as part of an excludable settlement payment shall be the fair market value of that property as of the
 time of the receipt.

(2) “Eligible individual” means a person who was persecuted on the basis of race or religion by the regime that was in control of the Ottoman Turkish Empire from 1915 through 1923.

(3) “Excludable settlement payment” means any payment or distribution to an individual (or the individual’s heirs or estate) that is any of the following:

(A) Is payable by reason of the individual’s status as an eligible individual, including any amount payable by any foreign or domestic entity or a fund established by any entity, any amount payable as a result of a final resolution of a legal action, and any amount payable under a law providing for payments or restitution of property.

(B) Constitutes compensation to the individual from 1915 until 1923,
 by reason of the individual’s status as an eligible individual, including any proceeds of insurance under policies issued on eligible individuals immediately before 1915 and during the time period from 1915 until 1923.

(C) Consists of interest that is payable as part of any payment or distribution described in subparagraph (A) or (B).

(4) “Excludable interest” means any interest earned by any of the following:

(A) A fund to benefit eligible individuals or their heirs created by an international commission or an international organization.

(B) A fund subject to the administration of the United States courts created to provide excludable settlement payments to eligible individuals (or eligible individuals’ heirs or estates).

(c) (1) This section applies to any amount received on or after January 1, 2005.

(2) This section may not be construed to create any inference with respect to the proper tax treatment of any amount received before January 1, 2005.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 402, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

17131.3.

Any grant made in any taxable year by the Secretary of the Treasury under Section 1603 of the American Recovery and Reinvestment Tax Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5) to a person that places in service specified energy property shall not be includable in the gross income or the alternative minimum taxable income of the taxpayer, but shall be taken into account in determining the basis of the property to which that grant relates, except that the basis of that property shall be reduced
 using rules prescribed under Section 50(c) of the Internal Revenue Code in the same manner as a credit allowed under Section 48(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, and adjusted in accordance with rules applied by the Secretary of the Treasury under Section 1603(f) of the American Recovery and Reinvestment Tax Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5).

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 14, Sec. 11.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

17131.4.

(a) Section 106(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to contributions to health savings accounts, shall not apply.

(b) Section 106(g) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified small employer health reimbursement arrangement, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 16.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17131.5.

Section 125(d)(2)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the exception for health savings accounts, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 691, Sec. 7.6.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

17131.6.

Section 107 of the Internal Revenue Code is modified by substituting in paragraph (2) the phrase “the rental allowance paid to him or her as part of his or her compensation, to the extent used by him or her to rent or provide a home” in lieu of the phrase “the rental allowance paid to him as part of his compensation, to the extent used by him to rent or provide a home and to the extent such allowance does not exceed the fair rental value of the home, including furnishings and appurtenances such as a garage, plus the cost of utilities” contained
 therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 691, Sec. 8.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

17131.7.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2018, gross income shall not include earned income of an eligible taxpayer.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Earned income” has the same meaning as provided in Section 32(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to earned income, as modified to
 substitute the phrase “but only if such amounts would have been otherwise properly includable in gross income for the taxable year without regard to subdivision (a) and only to the extent that the earned income is derived from sources within Indian country in this state” for the phrase “but only if such amounts are includable in gross income for the taxable year.”

(2) “Eligible taxpayer” means an individual who is a member of a federally recognized Indian tribe in this state who resides within Indian country in this state.

(3) “Indian country” has the same meaning as provided in Section 30101.7.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 52, Sec. 4.   (SB 855)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

17131.8.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2019, gross income does not include any covered loan amount forgiven pursuant to Section 1106 of the Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act (Public Law 116-136), pursuant to the Paycheck Protection Program and Health Care Enhancement Act (Public Law 116-139), pursuant to the Paycheck Protection Program Flexibility Act of 2020 (Public Law 116-142), pursuant to the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260), or pursuant to the PPP Extension Act of 2021 (Public Law 117-6).

(b) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2019, gross income does not include any advance grant amount issued pursuant
 to Section 1110(e) of the Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act (Public Law 116-136), or pursuant to Section 331 of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260).

(c) (1) Notwithstanding Section 17280, for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2019, subsection (a) of Section 276 of Division N of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260) shall apply, except as provided.

(2) Paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Section 276 of Division N of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260) is modified by substituting the phrase “For purposes of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986” with “For purposes of this
 part.”

(3) The provisions of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Section 276 of Division N of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260), relating to paragraphs (2) and (3) of
 subsection (i) of Section 7A of the Small Business Act, shall not apply to an ineligible entity.

(4) Paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Section 276 of Division N of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260) shall not apply.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding Section 17280, for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2019, subsection (b) of Section 276 of Division N of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260) shall apply, except as provided.

(2) Subsection (b) of Section 276 of Division N of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260) is modified by substituting the phrase “For purposes of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986,
 in the case of any taxable year ending after the date of the enactment of this Act” with “For purposes of this part.”

(3) Paragraphs (2) and (3) of subsection (b) of Section 276 of Division N of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260) shall not apply to an ineligible entity.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding Section 17280, for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2019, subsection (a) of Section 278 of Division N of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260) shall apply, except as provided.

(2) Subsection (a) of Section 278 of Division N of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260) is modified by substituting the phrase “For purposes of the
 Internal Revenue Code of 1986” with “For purposes of this part.”

(3) Paragraphs (2) and (3) of subsection (a) of Section 278 of Division N of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260) shall not apply to an ineligible entity.

(f) (1) Notwithstanding Section 17280, for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2019, subsection (b) of Section 278 of Division N of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260) shall apply, except as provided.
